Massachusetts, session 194th, S1424.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4b of Chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the words '' action taken under'' in line 14, the following
words:- "chapter 31".
of 1